Utah statutes.
32A-12-101 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Applicability of Utah Criminal Code.
Except as otherwise provided, Title 76, Chapters 1, 2, 3, and 4, apply to the
prosecution of a criminal offense defined in this chapter or expressly
identified as a criminal offense in this title.
